Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-8] Member financial dues. (a)
The policy board shall identify the member financial dues necessary to sustain
the metropolitan planning organization. The member financial dues shall be
provided by interagency agreement with the members.

(b) Member financial dues received by a
metropolitan planning organization shall be used to fund the unified planning
work program.

(c) A policy board may allocate collective
financial resources to fund a unified planning work program. [L 2015, c 132, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next